Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-914
Defective bridge or highway; compliance with standards; effect.

For purposes of sections 13-912 and 13-913, no minimum maintenance road or highway shall be deemed to be in want of repair or insufficient if it complies with the standards and level of minimum maintenance developed pursuant to section 39-2113.

Laws 1983, LB 10, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2411.01.